Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 8

Special Endowment Funds in the Tennessee FFA Foundation, Inc.

43-1-801. Established.

There is established special FFA endowment funds in the Tennessee FFA Foundation, Inc.

Acts 1999, ch. 535, § 1.

Cross-References. Animals and animal husbandry, title 44.

Chief executive officers of administrative departments, § 4-3-111.

Department of agriculture, creation, organization and powers of administrative

Department of environment and conservation, title 4, ch. 3, part 5.

Departments and divisions, title 4, ch. 3, part 2.

Farmers' extension work, § 5-9-104.

Food, drugs and cosmetics, title 53.

Natural areas preservation, title 11, ch. 14.

Salaries of Class 1 and Class 2 officers, § 8-23-101.

State forests, title 11, ch. 4.

Tennessee heritage conservation trust fund, title 11, ch. 7.

43-1-802. Appropriations for endowment fund.

The Tennessee FFA Foundation, Inc. is eligible to receive appropriations for its endowment fund from the state general fund subject to the following conditions:

Neither an appropriation nor the income therefrom may be spent for any organization other than the Tennessee FFA Foundation, Inc.;

Any appropriation shall be released to such foundation only as a dollar-for-dollar match of private contributions to the endowment fund; and

Any appropriation shall not revert to the general fund at the end of any fiscal year prior to June 30, 2005, but shall be carried over from year to year for the purpose of accomplishing this part.

Acts 1999, ch. 535, § 2.

43-1-803. Interest on funds.

Interest accruing on investments of the funds deposited to the credit of the Tennessee FFA Foundation, Inc. under this endowment fund shall be used for the sole purpose of promoting FFA programs in the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1999, ch. 535, § 3.